Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Turnpike Projects

177.390.
Definitions for KRS 177.390 to 177.570.

As used in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

The word “department” shall mean the Department of Highways, or, if said department shall be abolished, the department, board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

to the department shall be given by law;

The word “project” or the words “turnpike project” shall mean any express highway or superhighway or such part or parts thereof as may be constructed under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

by the department, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, connecting highways, tollhouses, service stations, garages, restaurants, and administration, storage, and other buildings and facilities which the department may deem necessary for the operation of such project, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests which may be acquired by the department for the construction or the operation of such project;

The word “cost” as applied to a turnpike project shall embrace the cost of construction, the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights of way, property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the department for such construction, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, provision for working capital in such amount as the department shall determine to be reasonable, interest prior to and during construction, and, if deemed advisable by the department, for a period not exceeding two (2) years after completion of construction, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing any such project, administrative expense, and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the construction of the project, the financing of such construction, and the placing of the project in operation. Any obligation or expense heretofore or hereafter incurred by the department for traffic surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, engineering, and other services in connection with the construction of a project shall be regarded as a part of the cost of such project and may be reimbursed to the Commonwealth out of the proceeds of turnpike revenue bonds hereinafter authorized in KRS

177.400

to

177.570

;

The words “public highways” shall include all public highways, roads, and streets in the Commonwealth, whether maintained by the Commonwealth or by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision;

The word “bonds” or the words “turnpike revenue bonds” shall mean revenue bonds of the Commonwealth authorized under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

;

The word “owner” shall include all individuals, copartnerships, associations, or corporations having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements, and interests authorized to be acquired by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 3; 1960, ch. 174, § 1, effective March 25, 1960.

177.400.
Turnpike projects authorized.

In order to provide for the construction of modern express highways or superhighways embodying safety devices, including, when determined by the department to be feasible and necessary, center division, ample shoulder widths, long-sight distances, two (2) or more lanes in each direction and grade separations at intersections with other highways and railroads, and thereby facilitate vehicular traffic, remove many of the present handicaps and hazards on the congested highways in the Commonwealth, and promote the agricultural and industrial development of the Commonwealth, the Department of Highways is hereby authorized and empowered to construct, maintain, repair and operate turnpike projects, and to issue revenue bonds of the Commonwealth to finance such projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 1; 1960, ch. 174, § 2.

177.410.
General powers of Department of Highways as to turnpike projects.

The department is hereby authorized and empowered:

To construct, reconstruct, maintain, repair, operate, regulate and police turnpike projects at such locations within the Commonwealth as may be determined by the department and approved by the Governor;

To acquire sites abutting on any turnpike project, and to construct or contract for the construction of buildings and appurtenances for service stations, garages, restaurants and other services and to lease the same to others for any of such purposes (or, if leases cannot be made on acceptable terms, to operate any and all of the same) in such manner and under such terms as the department may determine;

To issue turnpike revenue bonds of the Commonwealth, payable solely from the tolls, revenues and other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one (1) or more turnpike projects, and to refund any of its bonds, all as provided in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

;

To fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls for transit over each turnpike project constructed by it;

To combine for financing purposes any two (2) or more turnpike projects;

To establish rules and regulations for the use of any turnpike project;

To acquire, hold and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, without reference to KRS Chapter 56;

To designate the locations and establish, limit and control such points of ingress and egress from each turnpike project as the department may determine to be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the department to insure the proper operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance to such project from any point or points not so designated;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under KRS

177.390

to

177.570

;

To employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;

To receive and accept from any federal agency grants for or in aid of the construction of any turnpike project, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any source of either money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made;

To expend any funds provided under the authority of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

in advertising the facilities and services of a turnpike project or projects to the traveling public; and

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 4; 1960, ch. 174, § 3.

177.420.
Acquisition of property — Condemnation — Possession — Special provisions for condemning railroad property.

The department is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, whenever it shall deem such purchase expedient, solely from funds provided under the authority of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, such lands, structures, property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights, which are located within the Commonwealth, as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction and operation of any project, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the department.

Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or whenever the owner is legally incapacitated or is absent, unknown or unable to convey valid title, the department is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, copartnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility or other corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary or convenient for the construction or the efficient operation of any project or necessary in the restoration of public or private property damaged or destroyed. Any such proceedings shall be conducted, and the compensation to be paid shall be ascertained and paid, in the manner provided by the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth then applicable which relate to condemnation or to the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the department. Title to any property acquired by the department shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the department. In any condemnation proceedings the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action or proceeding may make such orders as may be just to the department and to the owners of the property to be condemned and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage by reason of the failure of the department to accept any pay for the property, but neither such undertaking or security nor any act or obligation of the department shall impose any liability upon the Commonwealth except as may be paid from the funds provided under the authority of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

.

If the owner, lessee or occupier of any property to be condemned shall refuse to remove his personal property therefrom or give up possession thereof, the department may proceed to obtain possession in any manner now or hereafter provided by law.

With respect to any railroad property or right-of-way upon which railroad tracks are located, any powers of condemnation or of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire only an easement interest therein which shall be located either sufficiently far above or sufficiently far below the grade of any railroad track or tracks upon such railroad property so that neither the proposed project nor any part thereof, including any bridges, abutments, columns, supporting structures and appurtenances, nor any traffic upon it, shall interfere in any manner with the use, operation or maintenance of the trains, tracks, works or appurtenances or other property of the railroad nor endanger the movement of the trains or traffic upon the tracks of the railroad. Prior to the institution of condemnation proceedings for such easement over or under such railroad property or right-of-way, plans and specifications of the proposed project showing compliance with the above-mentioned above or below grade requirements and showing sufficient and safe plans and specifications of such overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances shall be submitted to the railroad for examination and approval. If the railroad fails or refuses within thirty (30) days to approve the plans and specifications so submitted, the matter shall be submitted to the Public Service Commission of Kentucky whose decision, arrived at after due consideration in accordance with its usual procedure, shall be final as to the sufficiency and safety of such plans and specifications and as to such elevations or distances above or below the tracks. Said overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances shall be constructed only in accordance with such plans and specifications and in accordance with such elevations or distances above or below the tracks so approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission as the case may be. A copy of the plans and specifications approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission shall be filed as an exhibit with the petition for condemnation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 5.

177.430.
Grade separations — Relocation or vacation of existing highway — Rights of access — Regulations as to public utility facilities on or along turnpike project.

The department shall have power to construct grade separations at intersections of any turnpike project with public highways and to change and adjust the lines and grades of such highways so as to accommodate the same to the design of such grade separation. The cost of such grade separations and any damage incurred in changing and adjusting the lines and grades of such highways shall be ascertained and paid by the department as a part of the cost of such turnpike project.

If the department shall find it necessary to change the location of any portion of any public highway, it shall cause the same to be reconstructed at such location as the department shall deem most favorable and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway. The cost of such reconstruction and any damage incurred in changing the location of any such highway shall be ascertained and paid by the department as a part of the cost of such turnpike project.

Any public highway affected by the construction of any turnpike project may be vacated or relocated by the department in the manner now provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public roads, and any damages awarded on account thereof shall be paid by the department as a part of the cost of such project.

In addition to the foregoing powers the department and its authorized agents and employees may enter upon any lands, waters and premises in the Commonwealth for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, drillings and examinations as they may deem necessary or convenient for the purposes of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings which may be then pending. The department shall make reimbursement for any actual damage resulting to such lands, waters and premises as a result of such activities.

The department shall also have power to make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation and removal of tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles and other equipment and appliances (herein called “public utility facilities”) of any public utility in, on, along, over or under any turnpike project. Whenever the department shall determine that it is necessary that any such public utility facilities which now are, or hereafter may be, located in, on, along, over or under any turnpike project should be relocated in such turnpike project, or should be removed from such turnpike project, the public utility owning or operating such facilities shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the department; provided, however, that the cost and expenses of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing such facilities in a new location or new locations, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights, acquired to accomplish such relocation or removal, shall be ascertained and paid by the department as a part of the cost of such turnpike project. In case of any such relocation or removal of facilities, the public utility owning or operating the same, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate such facilities, with the necessary appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate such facilities in their former location or locations. No utility shall have the privilege of establishing its lines or properties within the right-of-way of a turnpike, except upon the conditions and terms prescribed by the department; however, a utility shall be permitted to connect its lines with service stations, garages, restaurants and other installations permitted to exist upon the right-of-way of the turnpike.

Costs and expenses paid by the department as permitted by subsections (1), (2), (3), and (5) of this section may in the discretion of the department be reimbursed to it from the proceeds of bonds issued for the project or projects under KRS

177.390

to

177.570

if so provided in the proceedings or trust indenture pursuant to which such bonds are issued.

The Commonwealth hereby consents to the use of all lands owned by it, including lands lying under water, which are deemed by the department to be necessary for the construction or operation of any turnpike project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 6; 1960, ch. 174, § 4.

177.440.
Limited access to turnpikes.

All turnpikes established under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

are declared to be limited access facilities, within the meaning and subject to the provisions of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

, and KRS

177.990

. No right of access to a turnpike shall vest in the holder of adjacent or neighboring property by reason of the proposal to construct, or the construction and operation of, a turnpike. Nothing in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

shall be construed to create any right of access in an owner near or adjacent to an entranceway to a turnpike, where such right did not already exist to an entranceway on a road or highway which has been incorporated into the turnpike.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 7.

177.450.
Turnpike revenue bonds.

The department is authorized to provide, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of turnpike revenue bonds of the Commonwealth for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more turnpike projects. The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

for payment. The bonds of any issue may be in one (1) or more series and any one (1) or more of the series may enjoy equal or subordinate status with respect to the pledge of funds from which they are payable, shall be dated, shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates, payable at least annually, shall mature at a time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates, all as may be determined by the department, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the department, at a price or prices and under terms and conditions as may be fixed by the department prior to the issuance of the bonds. The department shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached to the bonds, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places for payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. The bonds shall be signed by the commissioner of highways, and the great seal of the Commonwealth or a facsimile signature of the commissioner shall be affixed to the bonds and attested by the Secretary of State by his facsimile signature, and any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the commissioner of highways. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until the delivery. All bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the Commonwealth. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the department may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The department may sell the bonds in a manner, either at public or private sale, and for a price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of KRS 177.390 to 177.570.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the turnpike project or projects for which the bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in a manner and under the restrictions, if any, as the department may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement mentioned in KRS

177.460

securing the bonds. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than the cost, additional bonds may be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund or funds for the bonds or any account or accounts as the department shall have provided in the proceedings or trust agreement authorizing and securing the bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the department may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The department may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, department, or agency of the Commonwealth, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 8; 1960, ch. 174, § 5; 1996, ch. 274, § 38, effective July 15, 1996.

177.460.
Trust agreement to secure bonds — Rights and remedies of bondholders.

In the discretion of the department, any bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the department and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust agreement or the proceedings providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the tolls and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any turnpike project or any part thereof. Such trust agreement or proceedings providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the department in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the turnpike project or projects in connection with which such bonds shall have been authorized, the rates of toll to be charged, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the department. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or proceedings may contain such other provisions as the department may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the turnpike project or projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 9.

177.470.
Bonds not debt of Commonwealth.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

. All such revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Commonwealth shall not be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues of the project or projects for which they are issued and, if so provided in the proceedings or trust agreement authorizing or providing for the issuance of such bonds, from other available funds pledged to the payment thereof, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 2; 1960, ch. 174, § 6.

177.480.
Tolls for use of turnpike — Contracts for utility and service facilities — Disposition of toll revenues — Maintenance of turnpike by Department of Highways.

The department is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the use of each turnpike project and the different parts or sections thereof, and to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the use of any part thereof, including the right-of-way adjoining the paved portion, for placing thereon telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, service stations, garages, stores, hotels, and restaurants, or for any other purpose except for tracks for railroad or railway use, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for such use. A sufficient number of service stations shall be authorized to be established in each service area along any such turnpike to permit reasonable competition by private business in the public interest.

Tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

as to provide funds sufficient, with any other available funds, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining, repairing, operating, regulating, and policing such turnpike project or projects, unless such cost or any part thereof has been assumed by the department as provided in this section, and (b) the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes. Such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth. The tolls and all other revenues derived from the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair, operation, regulation, and policing, and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside in a sinking fund or funds which are hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the tolls or other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the department shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the department, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the proceedings nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the department. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of any such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such proceedings or in such trust agreement, any such sinking fund shall be a fund for all bonds provided to be payable therefrom without distinction or priority of one over another.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the department may, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, covenant to pay all or any part of the cost of maintaining, repairing, operating, regulating, and policing any project constructed under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, and the department may, in such proceedings or trust agreement, covenant to make up all or any part of any deficiency in the fund or funds pledged to and charged with the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds from any funds or tax revenues available for general purposes of the department and not required by law to be devoted to some other purpose, and, inasmuch as such project will at all times belong to the Commonwealth, any such covenant will have the force of contract between the Commonwealth and the holders of such revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the department may, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, pledge to the payment of such bonds all motor fuel taxes and surtaxes collected by the Commonwealth on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed on any project financed under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, except the two-sevenths (2/7) of said motor fuel taxes provided by KRS

138.220

to be set aside for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of rural and secondary roads, and covenant to deposit such motor fuel taxes and surtaxes from time to time in the sinking fund or funds pledged to the payment of such bonds. In determining the amount of motor fuel consumed on any turnpike project the department shall divide the total miles traveled on such project by passenger automobiles, single unit trucks, and semitrailer trucks and buses as determined by the department by the average number of miles per gallon of motor fuel consumed by each of those classes of motor vehicles on the following basis:

Passenger automobiles15 miles per gallon

Single unit trucks 10 miles per gallon

Semitrailer trucks and buses5 miles per gallon

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 10; 1960, ch. 174, § 7.

177.490.
Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in KRS

177.390

to

177.570

. The proceedings authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as KRS 177.390 to 177.570 and such proceedings or trust agreement may provide.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 11.

177.500.
Remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted under KRS

177.390

to

177.570

or under such trust agreement or the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by KRS 177.390 to 177.570 or by such trust agreement or proceedings to be performed by the department or by any officer or employee thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of tolls.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 12.

177.510.
Turnpike properties and bonds exempt from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of turnpike projects by the department will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the department shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any turnpike project or any property acquired or used by the department under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

or upon the income therefrom, and the bonds issued under the provisions of KRS 177.390 to 177.570, their transfer and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof) shall at all times be free from taxation within the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 13.

177.520.
Turnpike bonds valid for purposes of investment or collateral.

Bonds issued by the department under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies, agencies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 14; 1960, ch. 174, § 8.

177.530.
Maintenance of turnpike — Restoration of private property — Donation of property by county or city — Annual report of turnpike activities — Audits — Personnel of Department of Highways not to have interest in project — Penalty for failure to pay toll — Lien on vehicle.

Each turnpike project when constructed and opened to traffic shall be maintained and kept in good condition and repair by the department and shall be operated and maintained by such force of toll-takers and other operating and maintenance employees and, unless policed by the Department of Kentucky State Police as an ordinary incident to the performance of statutory functions, shall be policed by the department by such force of police, as the department may in its discretion employ, and the department may be reimbursed for the cost thereof unless it has previously assumed such cost as provided in KRS

177.480

.

All private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable or adequate compensation made therefor out of funds provided under the authority of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

.

All counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions and all public agencies and commissions of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, are hereby authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant, or convey to the department at its request upon such terms and conditions as the proper authorities of such counties, cities, towns, political subdivisions, agencies, or commissions of the Commonwealth may deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality, other than the regular and formal action of the authorities concerned, any real property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the department, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public use.

On or before January 30 in each year the department shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding calendar year to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The department shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants, and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction or operation of the project. Such audits shall be deemed to be public records within the meaning of KRS 61.870(2).

No officer or employee of the department shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the sale or purchase of any bonds authorized by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

. Violation of this provision is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who uses any turnpike project and fails or refuses to pay the toll provided therefor shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both, and in addition thereto the department shall have a lien upon the vehicle driven by such person for the amount of such toll and may take and retain possession thereof until the amount of such toll and all charges and penalties in connection therewith shall have been paid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 15; 1960, ch. 174, § 9; 1966, ch. 255, § 164; 1980, ch. 188, § 133, effective July 15, 1980; 2007, ch. 85, § 186, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where city police are required to use segments of the Kentucky Turnpike while on routine patrol or when responding to a call or conducting an investigation in or on property within the city limits, the police should not be required to pay tolls for such use of the turnpike.

OAG 72-848

.